Utah statutes.
78B-1-202.   Proceedings at which interpreter is to be provided for hearing impaired.

(1)  If a hearing-impaired person is a party or witness at any stage of any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding in this state or in its political subdivisions, including civil and criminal court proceedings, grand jury proceedings, proceedings before a magistrate, juvenile proceedings, adoption proceedings, mental health commitment proceedings, and any proceeding in which a hearing-impaired person may be subjected to confinement or criminal sanction, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter to interpret the proceedings to the hearing-impaired person and to interpret the hearing-impaired person's testimony.  If the hearing-impaired person does not understand sign language, the appointing authority shall take necessary steps to ensure that the hearing-impaired person may effectively and accurately communicate in the proceeding.

(2)  If a juvenile whose parent or parents are hearing-impaired is brought before a court for any reason whatsoever, the court shall appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter to interpret the proceedings to the hearing-impaired parent and to interpret the hearing-impaired parent's testimony.  If the hearing-impaired parent or parents do not understand sign language, the appointing authority shall take any reasonable, necessary steps to ensure that the hearing-impaired person may effectively and accurately communicate in the proceeding.

(3)  In any hearing, proceeding, or other program or activity of any department, board, licensing authority, commission, or administrative agency of the state or of its political subdivisions, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter for the hearing-impaired participants if the interpreter is not otherwise compensated for those services.  If the hearing-impaired participants do not understand sign language, the appointing authority shall take any reasonable, necessary steps to ensure that hearing-impaired persons may effectively and accurately communicate in the proceeding.

(4)  If a hearing-impaired person is a witness before any legislative committee or subcommittee, or legislative research or interim committee or subcommittee or commission authorized by the state Legislature or by the legislative body of any political subdivision of the state, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter to interpret the proceedings to the hearing-impaired person and to interpret the hearing-impaired person's testimony.  If the hearing-impaired witness does not understand sign language, the appointing authority shall take any reasonable, necessary steps to ensure that hearing-impaired witness may effectively and accurately communicate in the proceeding.

(5)  If it is the policy and practice of a court of this state or of its political subdivisions to appoint counsel for indigent people, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter or other necessary services for hearing-impaired, indigent people to assist in communication with counsel in all phases of the preparation and presentation of the case.

(6)  If a hearing-impaired person is involved in administrative, legislative, or judicial proceedings, the appointing authority shall recognize that family relationship between the particular hearing-impaired person and an interpreter may constitute a possible conflict of interest and select a qualified interpreter who will be impartial in the proceedings.

